Utah statutes.
73-5a-104.   Qualifications of persons designing dams.
Each plan for the construction, enlargement, repair, alteration, or removal of
any dam in this state shall be prepared by a qualified engineer who is:
(1)  licensed in Utah; and
(2)  experienced in dam design and construction.
